Nebraska, session 109, LB409.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB409 LB409
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 70-1003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1003 (1)(a) There is hereby established an independent board to
be known as the Nebraska Power Review Board. The board shall consist of
five members, including (i) at least one engineer, (ii) at least one
attorney, and (iii) three additional persons until, after the effective
date of this act, one such person appointed pursuant to this subdivision
(1)(a)(iii) of this section vacates his or her position or his or her
term expires, whichever occurs first, at which time the board shall
consist of the members provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of this
subsection.
(b) Upon the first vacation of the position or expiration of the
term of one of the members serving under subdivision (1)(a)(iii) of this
section that occurs after the effective date of this act, the board shall
consist of five members, including (i) at least one engineer, (ii) at
least one attorney, (iii) at least one licensed journeyman electrician
who shall be affiliated with a nonprofit labor organization for
electrical workers holding a certificate of exemption under section
501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code and shall be selected from a list
of licensed journeyman electricians recommended by such organization, and
(iv) two additional persons.
(c) No more than one person who is or who has within four years
preceding such person's appointment been either a director, an officer,
or an employee of any electric utility or an elective state officer shall
serve on the board at the same time. Any board member who previously was
either a director, an officer, or an employee of any electric utility
within four years preceding such board member's appointment shall refrain
from taking any action or making any decision in any proceeding before
the board that involves such electric utility for a period of four years
after the date such board member ceased being a director, an officer, or
an employee of such electric utility.
-2-

LB409 LB409
2025 2025
(d) (b) Members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor
subject to the approval of the Legislature. Upon expiration of the terms
of the members first appointed, the successors shall be appointed for
terms of four years. No member of the board shall serve more than three
consecutive terms. Any vacancy on the board arising other than from the
expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired
portion of the term, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy on the
board shall be eligible for reappointment for two more consecutive terms.
No more than three members of the board shall be registered members of
that political party represented by the Governor.
(2) Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars per
day for each day actually and necessarily engaged in the performance of
his or her duties, but not to exceed seven thousand dollars in any one
year, except for the member designated to represent the board on the
Southwest Power Pool Regional State Committee or its equivalent
successor, who shall receive two hundred fifty dollars for each day
actually and necessarily engaged in the performance of his or her duties,
not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars in any one year. If the member
designated to represent the board on the Southwest Power Pool Regional
State Committee should for any reason no longer serve in that capacity
during a year, the pay received while serving in such capacity shall not
be used for purposes of calculating the seven-thousand-dollar limitation
for board members not serving in that capacity. When another board member
acts as the proxy for the designated Southwest Power Pool Regional State
Committee member, he or she shall receive the same pay as the designated
member would have for that activity. Pay received while serving as proxy
for such designated member shall not be used for purposes of determining
whether the seven-thousand-dollar limitation has been met for board
members not serving as such designated member. Total pay to board members
for activities related to the Southwest Power Pool shall not exceed an
aggregate total of forty thousand dollars in any one year. Each member
-3-

LB409 LB409
2025 2025
shall be reimbursed for expenses while so engaged as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177. The board shall have jurisdiction as provided in
Chapter 70, article 10.
(3) The board shall elect from their members a chairperson and a
vice-chairperson. Decisions of the board shall require the approval of a
majority of the members of the board.
(4) The board shall employ an executive director and may employ such
other staff necessary to carry out the duties pursuant to Chapter 70,
article 10. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the
board and shall be solely responsible to the board. The executive
director shall be responsible for the administrative operations of the
board and shall perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned
to him or her by the board. The board may obtain the services of experts
and consultants necessary to carry out the board's duties pursuant to
Chapter 70, article 10.
(5) The board shall publish and submit a biennial report with annual
data to the Governor, with copies to be filed with the Clerk of the
Legislature and with the Department of Environment and Energy. The report
submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The department shall consider the information in the
Nebraska Power Review Board's report when the department prepares its own
reports pursuant to sections 81-1606 and 81-1607. The report of the board
shall include:
(a) The assessments for the fiscal year imposed pursuant to section
70-1020;
(b) The gross income totals for each category of the industry and
the industry total;
(c) The number of suppliers against whom the assessment is levied,
by category and in total;
(d) The projected dollar costs of generation, transmission, and
microwave applications, approved and denied;
-4-

LB409 LB409
2025 2025
(e) The actual dollar costs of approved applications upon
completion, and a summary of an informational hearing concerning any
significant divergence between the projected and actual costs;
(f) A description of Nebraska's current electric system and
information on additions to and retirements from the system during the
fiscal year, including microwave facilities;
(g) A statistical summary of board activities and an expenditure
summary;
(h) A roster of power suppliers in Nebraska and the assessment each
paid; and
(i) Appropriately detailed historical and projected electric supply
and demand statistics, including information on the total generating
capacity owned by Nebraska suppliers and the total peak load demand of
the previous year, along with an indication of how the industry will
respond to the projected situation.
(6) The board may, in its discretion, hold public hearings
concerning the conditions that may indicate that retail competition in
the electric industry would benefit Nebraska's citizens and what steps,
if any, should be taken to prepare for retail competition in Nebraska's
electricity market. In determining whether to hold such hearings, the
board shall consider the sufficiency of public interest.
(7) The board may, at any time deemed beneficial by the board,
submit a report to the Governor with copies to be filed with the Clerk of
the Legislature and the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature.
The report filed with the Clerk of the Legislature and the committee
shall be filed electronically. The report may include:
(a) Whether or not a viable regional transmission organization and
adequate transmission exist in Nebraska or in a region which includes
Nebraska;
(b) Whether or not a viable wholesale electricity market exists in a
region which includes Nebraska;
-5-

LB409 LB409
2025 2025
(c) To what extent retail rates have been unbundled in Nebraska;
(d) A comparison of Nebraska's wholesale electricity prices to the
prices in the region; and
(e) Any other information the board believes to be beneficial to the
Governor, the Legislature, and Nebraska's citizens when considering
whether retail electric competition would be beneficial, such as, but not
limited to, an update on deregulation activities in other states and an
update on federal deregulation legislation.
(8) The board may establish working groups of interested parties to
assist the board in carrying out the powers set forth in subsections (6)
and (7) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 70-1003, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-6-